Georgia, session 2025_26, HB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended by revising Code Section 21-2-35, relating to emergency
rules and regulations, imminent peril requirement, and procedures, as follows:
"21-2-35.
(a) Except for emergency rule making as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code
section, the State Election Board shall only promulgate, amend, adopt, or repeal rules and
regulations during odd-numbered years. After July 1, 2025, the State Election Board shall
take no rule-making action upon nonemergency rules or regulations, including the initiation
of any rule making, promulgation, amendment, adoption, or repeal of nonemergency rules
or regulations in an even-numbered year.
H. B. 503
- 1 -

LC 47 3412
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Chapter 3 of Title 38, relating to
emergency management, or Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure
Act,' to the contrary, the State Election Board may only adopt emergency rules or
regulations in circumstances of imminent peril to public health, safety, or welfare. To
adopt any such emergency rule or regulation, in addition to any other rule-making
requirement of this chapter or Chapter 13 of Title 50, the State Election Board shall:
(1) Give notice to the public of its intended action;
(2) Immediately upon the setting of the date and time of the meeting at which such
emergency rule or regulation is to be considered give notice by email of its intended
action to:
(A) The Governor;
(B) The Lieutenant Governor;
(C) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(D) The chairpersons of the standing committees of each house of the General
Assembly tasked with election matters;
(E) The Secretary of State;
(F) Legislative counsel; and
(G) The chief executive officer of each political party registered pursuant to subsection
(a) of Code Section 21-2-110; and
(3) State in the notices required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection the nature
of the emergency and the manner in which such emergency represents an imminent peril
to public health, safety, or welfare.
(b)(c) Upon adoption or promulgation of any emergency rule or regulation pursuant to
subsection (b) of this Code section, a majority of the State Election Board shall certify in
writing that such emergency rule or regulation was made in strict and exact compliance
with the provisions of this chapter and subsection (e) of Code Section 50-13-4.
H. B. 503
- 2 -

LC 47 3412
(c)(d) In the event of any conflict between this Code section and any provision of Chapter
13 of Title 50, this Code section shall govern and supersede any such conflicting
provision."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 503
- 3 -